tests/data/eat.lexc
!!! eat.lexc !!!
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Mass


LEXICON Root

Eat ;


LEXICON Eat

eat+N+Mass:eats #;
eat+V+Past:ate  #;
eat             Vinf;


LEXICON Vinf

+V:0                #;
+V+3P+Sg:eats       #;
+V+PastPart:eaten   #;
+V+PresPart:eating  #;
